Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2098
Civil penalties; department; powers.

(1) The department may assess, enforce, and collect civil penalties against a nursing facility which the department has found in violation of federal regulations for participation in the medicaid program pursuant to the authority granted to the department under section 81-604.03.

(2) If the department finds that a violation is life threatening to one or more residents or creates a direct threat of serious adverse harm to one or more residents, a civil penalty shall be imposed for each day the deficiencies which constitute the violation exist. The department may assess an appropriate civil penalty for other violations based on the nature of the violation. Any civil money penalty assessed shall not be less than fifty dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars for each day the facility is found to be in violation of such federal regulations. Any civil money penalty assessed shall include interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 73;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 181;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 524;

Laws 2019, LB22, § 2.